District of Columbia statutes.
29-903

Incorporators.

Any 5 or more natural persons or 2 or more associations may incorporate in the District under this chapter.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720
1973 Ed., § 29-802.
1981 Ed., § 29-1102.
2001 Ed., § 29-902.